New York, session 2025-2026, S7642.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 2807-d of the 2 public health law, as amended by chapter 41 of the laws of 1992, subpar- 3 agraph (i) as amended by chapter 639 of the laws of 1996, is amended to 4 read as follows: 5 (b) Subject to the provisions of subdivision twelve of this section, 6 the following categories of hospitals shall not be charged assessments 7 pursuant to this section: (i) voluntary nonprofit and private proprie- 8 tary general hospitals which qualify for distributions made in accord- 9 ance with paragraph (c) of subdivision nineteen of section twenty-eight 10 hundred seven-c of this article, or for assessments during the period 11 January first, nineteen hundred ninety-seven through December thirty- 12 first, nineteen hundred ninety-seven voluntary nonprofit and private 13 proprietary general hospitals which qualified for distributions made in 14 accordance with paragraph (c) of subdivision nineteen of section twen- 15 ty-eight hundred seven-c of this article as of December thirty-first, 16 nineteen hundred ninety-five; (ii) voluntary nonprofit hospitals totally 17 financed by charitable contributions or by the income thereon dedicated 18 to free care of low income patients; [and] (iii) any facility dedicated 19 solely to the care of police, firefighters, volunteer firefighters, and 20 emergency service personnel; and all five New York state veterans homes 21 including the New York State Veterans Home at Oxford, the New York State 22 Veterans Home at Montrose, the New York State Veterans Home at Batavia, 23 the New York State Veterans Home at Saint Albans and the Long Island 24 State Veterans Home at Stony Brook University, that care for honorably EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10844-02-5 S. 7642 2 1 discharged veterans, spouses and widows of honorably discharged veterans 2 and gold star parents. 3 § 2. The commissioner of health shall take all actions and do all 4 things necessary to implement the provisions of this act, including, but 5 not limited to applying to the secretary of the department of health and 6 human services for any necessary waivers pursuant to federal law and 7 regulation to ensure the exclusion of facilities dedicated solely to the 8 care of veterans from the requirements of section 2807-d of the public 9 health law. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 11 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law.